Hawaii statutes.
§665-3 Defenses. In such actions no
person shall be allowed to defend against the State on the ground of being in
possession of the property, unless the person proves that the person is in
possession under color of title, or has been in adverse possession thereof for
a period not less than twenty years and that the taxes upon the property have
been paid by the person during the last twelve years of the period. [L 1886, c
8, §3; am imp L 1898, c 19, §1; RL 1925, §2915; RL 1935, §4232; RL 1945,
§10243; RL 1955, §235-3; HRS §665-3; am L 1973, c 26, §3; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 14 H. 365, 366 (1902).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next